Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201181-1369
Act, how cited.

Sections 81-1369 to 81-1388 shall be known and
may be cited as the State Employees Collective Bargaining Act.

Laws 1987, LB 661, § 1;

Laws 2011, LB397, § 19.
October 1, 2011